Washington statutes.
RCW 15.74.040

Financial requirements.

The commission shall maintain an account with one or more public depositaries, and may deposit moneys in the depositary and expend moneys for purposes authorized by this chapter in the form of drafts made by the commission. The commission shall keep accurate records of all receipts, disbursements, and other financial transactions in accordance with generally accepted principles of accounting, available for audit by the state auditor.

[ 1990 c 142 s 5.]